Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3708
Volunteers; requirements.

(1) All court appointed special advocate volunteers shall participate fully in preservice training, including, but not limited to, instruction on recognizing child abuse and neglect, cultural awareness, socioeconomic issues, child development, the juvenile court process, permanency planning, volunteer roles and responsibilities, advocacy, information gathering, and documentation. Volunteers shall be required to participate in observation of court proceedings prior to appointment.

(2) All volunteers shall receive a training manual that includes guidelines for service and duties.

(3) Each court appointed special advocate program shall provide a minimum of ten hours of inservice training per year to volunteers.

Laws 2000, LB 1167, § 31.